Utah statutes.
11-13-307.   Method of amending impact alleviation contract.

An impact alleviation contract or a determination order may be amended with the consent of the parties, or otherwise in accordance with their provisions. In addition, any party may propose an amendment to a contract or order which, if not agreed to by the other parties, may be submitted by the proposing party to the board for a determination of whether or not the amendment shall be incorporated into the contract or order. The board shall determine whether or not a contract or determination order shall be amended under the procedures and standards set forth in Sections 11-13-305 and 11-13-306.

